Utah statutes.
13-38a-302.   Credit card surcharges prohibited.

(1)  A seller may not impose a surcharge on a transaction for $10,000 or less that is paid for by using a credit card.

(2)  This section does not prohibit a seller from offering a discount on a transaction that is paid for with a credit card that:

(a)  is issued by the seller or an entity that is affiliated with the seller; or

(b)  bears the seller's service mark or trademark.



Enacted by Chapter 421, 2013 General Session

